src/phonology/vep-phon.twolc
! =================================== 
!! !!!The Veps morphophonological/twolc rules file 
! =================================== 


Alphabet
a b d e f g h i j k l m n o p r s š t u v z ž ü ä ö
A B D E F G H I J K L M N O P R S Š T U V Z Ž Ü Ä Ö

š ž y
Š Ž Y

ʼ !!= * @CODE@ = U+02BC MODIFIER LETTER APOSTROPHE
' !!= * @CODE@ = U+0027  APOSTROPHE

%{eØ%}:e ! vowel loss in oiged:oiktan
%{uØ%}:u ! vowel loss in sapug:sapkan
%{iØ%}:i ! vowel loss in paltin:paltnan
%{aØ%}:a ! vowel loss in samal:samlan
%{oØ%}:o ! vowel loss in zerkol:zerklon

! Vowel harmony with "(t)a/ä"
AÄ1:a
AÄ1:ä
AÄ1:0

! Vowel harmony with "loi/löi" also kalatOÖ1in
OÖ1:o
OÖ1:ö

! Vowel harmony with "ttu/ttü"
UY1:u
UY1:ü

! this appears in the illative
V1:a
V1:e
V1:i
V1:o
V1:u
V1:ü
V1:ä
V1:ö

! These appear with the inessive and adessive
V2:a
V2:e
V2:i
V2:o
V2:u
V2:ü
V2:ä
V2:ö

! These reduplicate the preceding vowel if it in turn is preceded by a consonant
V3:a
V3:e
V3:i
V3:o
V3:u
V3:ü
V3:ä
V3:ö
V3:0

! These are for developing underlying morphology rules:
! SNM: Symbols copied from root.lexc, not earlier defined; they need proper
! rules to be realised (or not) depending on context, and with correct
! realisation.
%^RmVow:0 !!= * @CODE@ for removing vowels

 AO1:0
  D1:0
  E1:0
 EH1:0
 EI1:0
  I1:0
INE1:0
QAO1:0 QAO1:a
QAQ1:0
QEQ1:0
QÄQ1:0
  U1:0
 ZD1:0
 ZD1:0
 ZS1:0
 ZS1:0

! Veps 
 %^DEVOICE:0 ! vezi:vet; pen’:pen’t


! this k is not effected by gradation
K1:k
%^NoGrad:0 ! This will be placed after a stem to break Gradation

! this weakens the stem _ompel_ to _ommel_
%^WGStem:0

! The ti => si
%^TS:0

! Vowel raising
%^RVow:0

%- !Hyphen in  constructions 
%>
#   ! Word boundary for both lexicalised and dynamic compounds

Cx
Cy
X
Y

%^LVow:0
%^LCns:0
%^WCns:0
%^AtoO:0
%^ÄtoÖ:0
%^OddSyll:0
%^StretchSyll2:0
%^SyllBr:0
%^E1:0



;


Sets

VowBack = a o u ;
VowFront = ä ö y ü ;
VowNeutral = e i ; 
VowNonHigh = a o ä ö e ;
Vow = a o u ä ö y ü e i ;

Cns = b d f g h j k l m n p r s š t v z ž ;
CnsVoiceless = f h k p s š t ;

Letters = Vow Cns ;



Definitions

! Front Trigger
FT =  [ # Cns* [ VowFront | VowNeutral | i: ] | :VowFront ] \[ # | VowBack: | :VowBack ]*  ;


! Back Trigger 
BT =   ( # Cns* ( [ VowNeutral | i: ] \[ # | VowFront: | :VowFront ]* ) ) [ VowBack: | :VowBack ]  \[ # | VowFront: | :VowFront ]* ;

! Gradation strong to weak
!GS2W = [ p:v | m p:m | t:0 | l t:l | r t:r | n t:n | s t:s | k:0 | l k:0 | r k:0 | n k:g | s k:0 ] ;

! Short vowel
SV = [ [ # | Cns+ ] :Vow ] ;

 ! If a vowel is preceeded by this, is can be long
!  in both the inessive and the adessive
! Inessive lengthening of vowel
IL = [ # Cns* Vow : Cns:+ | Cns* Vow+ Cns:+  Vow:+ Cns:+  ] ;

!! Right context for gradation
GRC =  [ [ ( %> ) AÄ1: | OÖ1: | UY1: | Vow: | :Vow ]  ( %> i ) |  %>  i ] %> %^WCns:0  ;

! oma:ommaa, 
! Subsequent Long Vowel
! preceeded by "Cns _"
! 2012-10-11 SLV =  [ :Vow [ ( %> %^LCns:0 %^LVow:0 | %> %^LCns:0 | %> i %> | %> ) [ V1:Vow | AÄ1: ] |  0:Vow %> ( %^LCns:0 | %^WCns: ) %^LVow: | %> %^LCns:0  ] ] ;

!! !!!Rules

Rules


!
!! !!Vowel change 
!

! Stem vowel loss before preterite and plural "i"
"StemVowLoss before _i_"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
 e:0 <=> # Cns* Vow+ Cns+ _  %> i  ;

"Stem-internal vowel loss"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 Vx:0 <=> _ Cns: %^RmVow: ;
              where Vx in (%{aØ%} %{iØ%} %{uØ%} %{eØ%} %{oØ%} ) ;


"QAO1 Sg Rule"
QAO1:a <=> _ ( %^DEVOICE: ) %> Cns ;

"QAO1 Pl Rule"
QAO1:o <=> _ ( %^DEVOICE: ) %> :i ( %^DEVOICE: ) Cns ;



!! !!Consonant change 

"devoicing of adjecent stops"
!! __@RULENAME@__ vauged: vauktan
 Cx:Cy <=>  _ [%{eØ%}: |%{uØ%}: ] Cns:CnsVoiceless %^RmVow: %^DEVOICE: %> ;
            Cns:CnsVoiceless [ %{eØ%}: | %{uØ%}: ] _ %^RmVow: %^DEVOICE: %> ;
              where Cx in (g d)
                    Cy in (k t) matched ;


"d:z in vodes, voziš"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
d:z <=> Vow+  _  %^TS:0  ; ! GRC ;
! last-minute verbs
! "ti:si in verbs"
!   [ n | l | r | Vow Vow ] _ %^TS:0 ; !  pittää: piti 


"d:t in voden, vot"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
 d:t <=> [ d: | ( n | l | r ) ’ | z: ] %^DEVOICE:0 %> _ [ # | %- ] ;

"d:0 in voden, vot"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
 d:0 <=> _ %^DEVOICE:0 %> d: ;

"z:s in meletuz:meletust"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
 z:s <=> _ %^DEVOICE:0 ;

"’:0 before vowels"
!! __@RULENAME@__  
 ’:0 <=> _  %>  Vow ;

! Working with Veps

!
!! Borrowed from Ingrian 
!
